Arkansas, session 2025, HB1329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. The purpose of this act is to amend Arkansas law concerning
committees of the General Assembly and to reorganize the standing committees
and the subject matter interim committees of the House of Representatives.








*MBM117*
01/30/2025 10:01:34 AM MBM117